Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 15 Incorporation of Fiduciary Powers by Reference

53-15-1 through 53-15-4.
[Repealed]

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 846, §§ 2, 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1586, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 53; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 53; Ga. L. 1990, p. 667, § 3. For present law on incorporation of fiduciary powers by reference, see Chapter 12 of Title 53; repealed by Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.